Utah statutes.
71-11-6.   Eligibility -- Admission requirements.
(1)  Application for admission shall be made separately to each nursing home
administrator.
(2)  Veterans and their spouses or surviving spouses who are residents of Utah
and in need of nursing home care may be admitted to any home.
(3)  Preference shall be given to veterans who are without adequate means of
support and unable, due to wounds, disease, old age, or infirmity, to properly
maintain themselves.
